Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-403
Department of Labor; educational opportunities for youth; identify resources.

The Department of Labor shall review current programs, policies, and funding sources to identify available resources that may provide educational opportunities for youth. Such opportunities shall include training and job experience in the repair and alteration of public buildings as may be necessary to comply with the requirements of the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990.

Laws 1994, LB 988, § 44.